Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7735.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
The general assembly finds that food waste constitutes thirteen percent (13%) of carbon
emissions in the State of Rhode Island; that the Act on Climate strategic report issued in December
of 2025 targets the reduction of food waste through composting; that one-third of the waste in the
Johnston land fill is food waste; that food waste generated at catered events constitutes a significant
portion of the solid waste stream; that composting and other forms of organic waste diversion
reduce disposal costs, conserve landfill capacity, and provide environmental benefits; and that
catered events present unique compliance challenges due to their temporary and mobile nature.
The purpose of this act is to ensure effective diversion of food waste at larger catered events
through the creation of annual diversion plans, requiring food recovery at large catered events, and
requiring caterer collaboration with compost service providers.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.20
ORGANICS DIVERSION AT CATERED EVENTS ACT
23-18.20-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Organics Diversion at Catered Events
Act.”

23-18.20-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Annual diversion plan" means the written statement submitted annually by the caterer
to the department of environmental management outlining its food waste diversion plan, identifying
its compost service provider, and acknowledging its obligation to compost food waste from catered
events.
(2) “Caterer” means any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of preparing
or providing food and beverage service at events or locations other than a fixed, licensed food
establishment.
(3) "Compost service provider" means a solid waste hauler that collects organic food waste
from homes and/or businesses to divert waste from landfills.
(4) “Covered event” means any event at which a caterer serves or prepares food for fifty
(50) or more meals, whether held on public or private property.
(5) “Diversion” means the separation of organic materials from solid waste for the purpose
of composting, anaerobic digestion, or other lawful organic recycling as regulated by the
department of health and/or department of environmental management.
(6) "Food recovery" means the collection of surplus food, including: unopened,
prepackaged, shelf stable items; wrapped fruits and vegetables with a thick skin; and unopened,
prepackaged perishable food items, provided a temperature controlled mechanism is in place to
maintain a safe temperature for food items.
23-18.20-3. Applicability.
(a) This chapter shall apply to all caterers operating at a covered event.
(b) This chapter shall not apply to:
(1) Private, noncommercial events held at a private residence; or
(2) Events for which no food waste is generated.
23-18.20-4. Annual diversion plan required.
(a) No caterer shall operate at a covered event unless an annual diversion plan has been
filed in accordance with this section.
(b) Acknowledgment of receipt of an annual diversion plan by the department of
environmental management shall not constitute approval of the plan, endorsement of its contents,
or a determination of compliance with environmental laws or regulations.
(c) The department of environmental management shall create the annual diversion plan
form, which shall require caterers to provide, at a minimum:
(1) A description of the food waste and organic materials expected to be generated;
LC004094 - Page 2 of 4

(2) The method by which such materials will be source-separated at the event;
(3) The name of the compost service provider that the caterer has engaged; and
(4) A description of collection containers and procedures to be used at covered events.
23-18.20-5. Recordkeeping.
(a) Each caterer subject to this chapter shall maintain records demonstrating compliance
with the annual diversion plan including, but not limited to, receipts, weight estimates, or service
invoices.
(b) Records shall be retained for a period of three (3) years and shall be made available
upon request to the department of environmental management.
23-18.20-6. Enforcement.
(a) The department of environmental management, in coordination with the department of
health may audit records and investigate compliance with this chapter.
(b) Any caterer who fails to submit the annual diversion plan shall be subject to a civil
penalty not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).
23-18.20-7. Regulations.
The department of environmental management, in consultation with the department of
health, may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and shall apply to covered events
permitted on or after that date.
========
LC004094
========
LC004094 - Page 3 of 4